Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5874.
people of the state of michigan enact: Enacting section 1. The state real estate transfer tax act, 1993 PA 330, MCL 207.521 to 207.537, is repealed. Enacting section 2. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 3. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5880 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. Enacting section 4. It is the intent of the legislature to annually appropriate sufficient funds from the state general fund to the state school aid fund created in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 to fully compensate for any loss of revenue to the state school aid fund resulting from repeal of the state real estate transfer tax act, 1993 PA 330, MCL 207.521 to 207.537.